Nebraska, session 109, LB1074.
Be it enacted by the people of the State of Nebraska,
-1-

LB1074 LB1074
2026 2026
Section 1. Section 69-1315, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
69-1315 (a) The expiration of any period of time specified by
contract, statute, or court order, during which an action or proceeding
may be commenced or enforced to obtain payment of a claim for money or
recovery of property, shall not prevent the money or property from being
presumed abandoned property, nor affect any duty to file a report
required by the Uniform Disposition of Unclaimed Property Act or to pay
or deliver abandoned property to the State Treasurer. Holders shall not
be required to report or to pay or to deliver abandoned property or
unclaimed funds as to which the statute of limitations applicable to the
enforcement of any claim to such property shall have expired prior to
December 25, 1969.
(b) Except as provided in subsection (c) of this section, no No
action or proceeding may be commenced by the State Treasurer with respect
to any duty of a holder under the act more than seven years after the
holder files a report for the period in which the duty arose. This
subsection shall not apply to holders described in section 69-1307.01.
(c) The period of limitation established under subsection (b) of
this section is tolled by the delivery of a notice by the State Treasurer
that a holder is subject to an examination under section 69-1322 or the
written election by the holder to enter into a voluntary disclosure
agreement, whichever occurs first. The tolling period shall end upon
completion of the examination under section 69-1322, the filing of any
report required pursuant to such voluntary disclosure agreement, or the
termination of such voluntary disclosure agreement by the State
Treasurer, whichever occurs first.
Sec. 2. Section 69-1317, Revised Statutes Supplement, 2025, is
amended to read:
69-1317 (a)(1)(i) Except as otherwise provided in this subdivision,
all funds received under the Uniform Disposition of Unclaimed Property
-2-

LB1074 LB1074
2026 2026
Act , including the proceeds from the sale of abandoned property under
section 69-1316, shall be deposited by the State Treasurer into the
Unclaimed Property Trust Fund from which he or she shall make prompt
payment of claims allowed pursuant to the act and payment of any expenses
related to unclaimed property. All funds received under section
69-1307.05 shall be deposited by the State Treasurer into the Unclaimed
Property Trust Fund from which he or she shall make prompt payment of
claims regarding such funds allowed pursuant to the act. All funds
received under section 69-1316 shall be deposited by the State Treasurer
into the Unclaimed Property Liquidation Proceeds Trust Fund. Transfers
from the Unclaimed Property Trust Fund to the General Fund may be made at
the direction of the Legislature. Before making any the deposit pursuant
to this subdivision, the State Treasurer he or she shall record the name
and last-known address of each person appearing from the holders' reports
to be entitled to the abandoned property, the name and last-known address
of each insured person or annuitant, and with respect to each policy or
contract listed in the report of a life insurance corporation, its
number, the name of the corporation, and the amount due. The record shall
be available for public inspection during business hours.
(ii) The record shall not be subject to public inspection or
available for copying, reproduction, or scrutiny by commercial or
professional locators of property presumed abandoned who charge any
service. A finders' fee cannot be charged by commercial or professional
locators of property presumed abandoned until twenty-four months after
the names from the holders' reports have been published or officially
disclosed. Records concerning the social security number, date of birth,
and last-known address of an owner shall be treated as confidential and
subject to the same confidentiality as tax return information held by the
Department of Revenue, except that the Auditor of Public Accounts shall
have unrestricted access to such records.
(iii) A professional finders' fee shall be limited to ten percent of
-3-

LB1074 LB1074
2026 2026
the total dollar amount of the property presumed abandoned. To claim any
such fee, the finder shall disclose to the owner the nature, location,
and value of the property, provide notice of when such property was
reported to the State Treasurer, and provide notice that the property may
be claimed by the owner from the State Treasurer free of charge. To claim
any such fee if the property has not yet been abandoned, the finder shall
disclose to the owner the nature, location, and value of the property,
provide notice of when such property will be reported to the State
Treasurer, if known, and provide notice that, upon receipt of the
property by the State Treasurer, such property may be claimed by the
owner from the State Treasurer free of charge.
(2)(i) The unclaimed property records of the State Treasurer, the
unclaimed property reports of holders, and the information derived by an
unclaimed property examination or audit of the records of a person or
otherwise obtained by or communicated to the State Treasurer may be
withheld from the public. Any record or information that may be withheld
under the laws of this state or of the United States when in the
possession of such a person may be withheld when revealed or delivered to
the State Treasurer. Any record or information that is withheld under any
law of another state when in the possession of that other state may be
withheld when revealed or delivered by the other state to the State
Treasurer.
(ii) Information withheld from the general public concerning any
aspect of unclaimed property shall only be disclosed to an apparent owner
of the property or to the escheat, unclaimed, or abandoned property
administrators or officials of another state if that other state accords
substantially reciprocal privileges to the State Treasurer.
(b)(1) On or before November 1 of each year prior to 2026, the State
Treasurer shall transfer any balance in excess of one million dollars
from the Unclaimed Property Trust Fund to the permanent school fund.
(2) On or before November 1 of each year beginning in 2026 through
-4-

LB1074 LB1074
2026 2026
2035, the State Treasurer shall transfer any balance in excess of five
one million dollars from the Unclaimed Property Trust Fund as follows:
(i) The first one million dollars to the Capitol Restoration Cash
Fund; and
(ii) Any remaining balance to the permanent school fund.
(3) On or before November 1 of each year beginning in 2036, the
State Treasurer shall transfer any balance in excess of five one million
dollars from the Unclaimed Property Trust Fund to the permanent school
fund.
(c) Before making any deposit to the credit of the permanent school
fund, the Capitol Restoration Cash Fund, or the General Fund, the State
Treasurer may deduct any costs related to unclaimed property and place
such funds in the Unclaimed Property Cash Fund.
(d) The Unclaimed Property Cash Fund is created. Transfers from the
fund to the General Fund may be made at the direction of the Legislature.
Any money in the Unclaimed Property Cash Fund available for investment
shall be invested by the state investment officer pursuant to the
Nebraska Capital Expansion Act and the Nebraska State Funds Investment
Act.
(e) The Unclaimed Property Liquidation Proceeds Trust Fund is
created. The fund shall be administered by the State Treasurer. The State
Treasurer shall credit money to the fund as provided in subdivision (a)
(1)(i) of this section. Money in the fund shall be transferred to the
Unclaimed Property Trust Fund as needed to pay claims arising under
section 69-1316. Money in the fund shall be used for no other purpose. At
such time as money in this fund is no longer needed to ensure the payment
of claims arising under section 69-1316, the balance remaining in the
fund shall be transferred to the Unclaimed Property Trust Fund. Any money
in the Unclaimed Property Liquidation Proceeds Trust Fund available for
investment shall be invested by the state investment officer pursuant to
the Nebraska Capital Expansion Act and the Nebraska State Funds
-5-

LB1074 LB1074
2026 2026
Investment Act.
Sec. 3. Original section 69-1315, Reissue Revised Statutes of
Nebraska, and section 69-1317, Revised Statutes Supplement, 2025, are
repealed.
-6-